Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB501.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. The Transportation Cabinet Budget is as follows:
PART I
OPERATING BUDGET
(1) Funds Appropriations: There is appropriated out of the General Fund, Road Fund, Restricted Funds
accounts, Federal Funds accounts, or Bond Funds accounts for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending
June 30, 2027, and for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2027, and ending June 30, 2028, the following discrete sums,
or so much thereof as may be necessary. Appropriated funds are included pursuant to KRS 48.700 and 48.710. Each
appropriation is made by source of respective fund or funds accounts. Appropriations for the budget units of the
Transportation Cabinet are subject to the provisions of Chapters 12, 42, 45, and 48 of the Kentucky Revised Statutes
and compliance with the conditions and procedures set forth in this Act.
A. TRANSPORTATION CABINET
Budget Units
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 500,000 500,000
Restricted Funds 2,754,800 2,660,800
Road Fund 76,462,000 74,717,900
TOTAL 79,716,800 77,878,700
(1) Biennial Highway Construction Plan: The Secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall produce a
single document that shall detail the enacted fiscal biennium 2026-2028 Biennial Highway Construction Program, the
2028-2032 Highway Preconstruction Program, and the Local Assistance Road Program.
(2) Adopt-A-Highway Litter Program: The Transportation Cabinet and the Energy and Environment
Cabinet may receive, accept, and solicit grants, contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of value from
any governmental agency, individual, nonprofit organization, or private business to be used for the Adopt-a-Highway
Litter Program or other statewide litter programs. Any contribution of this nature shall be deemed to be a contribution
to a state agency for a public purpose and shall be treated as Restricted Funds under KRS Chapter 45, shall be
reported according to KRS Chapter 48, and shall not be subject to restrictions set forth under KRS Chapter 11A.
(3) Budget Implementation: The General Assembly directs the Transportation Cabinet to carry out all
appropriations and budgetary language provisions contained in the Transportation Cabinet Budget. The Legislative
Research Commission shall review quarterly expenditure data to determine if an agency is out of compliance with
this directive. If the Legislative Research Commission suspects that any entity has acted in non-conformity with this
subsection, the Legislative Research Commission may order an audit or review at the agency’s expense. Such audit
findings, reviews, and reports shall be subject to the Kentucky Open Records Law. The Secretary of the
Transportation Cabinet shall provide a comprehensive annual report to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue, as appropriate, detailing expenditures related to the appropriations contained within the
budgetary language provisions for each budget unit within the Transportation Cabinet. If an agency does not expend
the full General Fund or Road Fund appropriations contained within a budgetary language provision, the unexpended
funds shall be transferred to the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705) or the Road Fund Surplus
Account (KRS 48.710), respectively.
(4) Riverport Improvements: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $500,000 in each fiscal
year to the Riverport Financial Assistance Trust Fund (KRS 174.210).
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(5) AASHTOWare: Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $1,200,000 in each fiscal year to
support the AASHTOWare system.
(6) On-Site Work: Notwithstanding any statute or administrative regulation to the contrary, employees of
the Transportation Cabinet shall not be permitted to telecommute unless specifically exempted by the Secretary of the
Transportation Cabinet. All exemptions to allow employees to telecommute shall be reported to the Legislative
Research Commission on a quarterly basis beginning August 1, 2026.
(7) Employee Health Exam Reimbursement: Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, the
contractually agreed upon reimbursement for required Commercial Driver’s License (CDL) physical examinations
shall be authorized for employees whose job duties necessitate maintenance of a valid CDL. Such examinations shall
be obtained through a medical provider of the employee’s choosing. Employees seeking reimbursement shall be
responsible for submitting all required documentation, including itemized receipts and applicable forms, in
accordance with Cabinet-established reimbursement policies and procedures.
2. AVIATION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,154,000 1,137,700
Restricted Funds 18,098,200 17,526,100
Federal Funds 500,700 500,700
Road Fund 835,900 833,700
TOTAL 20,588,800 19,998,200
(1) Operational Costs: Notwithstanding KRS 183.525(5), the above Restricted Funds appropriation
includes operational costs of the program in each fiscal year.
(2) Debt Service: Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $835,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
$833,700 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for debt service on previously authorized bonds. Notwithstanding KRS 183.525,
$835,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $833,700 in fiscal year 2027-2028 is transferred to the Road Fund from the
Kentucky Aviation Economic Development Fund to support debt service on those bonds.
3. DEBT SERVICE
2026-27 2027-28
Road Fund 100,330,300 103,213,000
(1) Economic Development Road Lease-Rental Payments: Included in the above Road Fund
appropriation is $100,080,300 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $102,963,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for Economic
Development Road lease-rental payments relating to projects financed by Economic Development Road Revenue
Bonds previously authorized by the General Assembly and issued by the Kentucky Turnpike Authority.
(2) Debt Payment Acceleration Fund Account: Notwithstanding KRS 175.505, no portion of the
revenues to the state Road Fund provided by the adjustments in KRS 138.220(2), excluding KRS 177.320 and
177.365, shall accrue to the Debt Payment Acceleration Fund account during the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium.
4. HIGHWAYS
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 217,654,900 348,294,800
Federal Funds 1,281,508,100 1,290,714,500
Road Fund 1,183,384,900 1,236,364,500
TOTAL 2,682,547,900 2,875,373,800
(1) Debt Service: Included in the above Federal Funds appropriation is $69,146,800 in fiscal year 2026-
2027 and $11,351,900 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for debt service on already issued Grant Anticipation Revenue
Vehicle (GARVEE) Bonds previously appropriated by the General Assembly.
(2) State-Supported Construction Program: Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is
$648,691,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $685,178,900 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the State-Supported
Construction Program.

CHAPTER 167 3
(3) Biennial Highway Construction Program: Included in the State-Supported Construction Program is
$416,612,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $503,288,900 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Road Fund for state
construction projects and the state match for federal projects in the 2026-2028 Biennial Highway Construction
Program.
(4) Highway Construction Contingency Account: Included in the State-Supported Construction Program
is $11,890,000 in each fiscal year for the Highway Construction Contingency Account. Notwithstanding KRS
45.247(2), (4), (5), (6), (7), and (8), the Secretary shall only expend Highway Construction Contingency moneys for
projects of an emergency nature or for projects that relieve a hazardous condition. Notwithstanding KRS 224.43-
505(2), included in the Highway Construction Contingency Account is $5,000,000 in each fiscal year to support the
Kentucky Pride Fund created in KRS 224.43-505. Notwithstanding KRS 45.247 and 177.320(4), included in the
Highway Construction Contingency Account is $290,000 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Transportation Center.
Also included in the Highway Construction Contingency Account for Railroads is $1,600,000 in each fiscal year for
public safety and service improvements which shall not be expended unless matched with nonstate funds equaling at
least 20 percent of the total amount for any individual project. Additionally, in each fiscal year, up to $350,000 of the
$1,600,000 appropriation may be used to establish and administer the Kentucky Rail Office in the Kentucky
Transportation Cabinet.
(5) 2024-2026 Biennial Highway Construction Plan: Projects in the enacted 2024-2026 Biennial
Highway Construction Plan are authorized to continue their current authorization into the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium.
If projects in previously enacted highway construction plans conflict with the 2026-2028 Biennial Highway
Construction Plan, the projects in the 2026-2028 Biennial Highway Construction Plan shall control. The Secretary
shall make every effort to maintain highway program delivery by adhering to the timeframes included in the 2026-
2028 Biennial Highway Construction Plan for those projects. It is the intent of the General Assembly that older
projects will be removed from the Biennial Highway Construction Plan in future budget bills.
(6) State Match Provisions: The Transportation Cabinet is authorized to utilize Road Fund or General
Fund state construction moneys or Toll Credits to match federal highway moneys.
(7) Federal Aid Highway Funds: If additional federal highway moneys are made available to Kentucky
by the United States Congress, the funds shall be used according to the following priority:
(a) Any demonstration-specific or project-specific moneys shall be used on the project identified; and
(b) All other funds shall be used to ensure that projects in the fiscal biennium 2026-2028 Biennial Highway
Construction Plan are funded.
If additional federal moneys remain after these priorities are met, the Transportation Cabinet may select
projects from the Highway Preconstruction Program.
(8) Road Fund Cash Management: The Secretary of the Transportation Cabinet may continue the Cash
Management Plan to address the policy of the General Assembly to expeditiously initiate and complete projects in the
fiscal biennium 2026-2028 Biennial Highway Construction Plan. Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 45, specifically
including KRS 45.242 and 45.244, the Secretary may concurrently advance projects in the Biennial Highway
Construction Plan by employing management techniques that maximize the Cabinet's ability to contract for and
effectively administer the project work. Under the approved Cash Management Plan, the Secretary shall continuously
ensure that the unspent project and Road Fund balances available to the Transportation Cabinet are sufficient to meet
expenditures consistent with appropriations provided. The Transportation Cabinet shall provide quarterly reports to
the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue when the General Assembly is not in session and the
Standing Committees on Appropriations and Revenue when the General Assembly is in session beginning July 1,
2026.
(9) Carry Forward of Appropriation Balances: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, unexpended Road Fund
and General Fund appropriations in the Highways budget unit for the Construction program, the Maintenance
program, and the Research program in fiscal year 2025-2026 and in fiscal year 2026-2027 shall not lapse but shall
carry forward. Unexpended Federal Funds and Restricted Funds appropriations in the Highways budget unit for the
Construction program, the Maintenance program, the Equipment Services program, and the Research program in
fiscal year 2025-2026 and in fiscal year 2026-2027, up to the amount of ending cash balances and unissued Highway
and GARVEE Bond Funds, to include any interest income earned on those bond funds, and grant balances shall not
lapse but shall carry forward.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(10) Federally Supported Construction Program: Included in the above Federal Funds appropriation is
$1,175,748,300 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,242,678,700 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for federal construction
projects.
(11) Highways Maintenance: Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $459,012,900 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $474,012,900 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for Highways Maintenance. Of this amount, $23,605,400 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $38,605,400 in fiscal year 2027-2028 is to support increased maintenance and snow and
ice removal.
(12) Delayed Projects Status Report: The Secretary of the Transportation Cabinet shall report by
September 30 of each fiscal year to the Interim Joint Committee on Transportation any project included in the
enacted Biennial Highway Construction Plan which has been delayed beyond the fiscal year for which the project
was authorized. The report shall include:
(a) The county name;
(b) The Transportation Cabinet project identification number;
(c) The route where the project is located;
(d) The length of the project;
(e) A description of the project and the scope of improvement;
(f) The type of local, state, or federal funds to be used on the project;
(g) The stage of development for the design, right-of-way, utility, and construction phases;
(h) The fiscal year in which each phase of the project was scheduled to commence;
(i) The estimated cost for each phase of the project;
(j) A detailed description of the circumstances leading to the delay; and
(k) The same information required in paragraphs (a) to (i) of this subsection for the project or projects
advanced with funds initially scheduled for the delayed project.
(13) Maintenance Reentry Employment Program: Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is
$1,000,000 in each fiscal year to support contracting with a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization or other entity that
employs individuals on probation or parole supervision to perform crew-based maintenance services. These
individuals shall be selected with input from the Department of Corrections and shall provide assistance with litter
abatement, graffiti removal, and vegetation control.
(14) Federal Highways Match: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the General Fund appropriation balance for
Federal Highways Match for fiscal years 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
(15) Local Assistance Road Program: Included in the State-Supported Construction Program is
$70,189,400 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $20,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Road Fund to fund the
Local Assistance Road Program to assist with county and city roads.
(16) County and City Bridge Improvement Program: Included in the State-Supported Construction
Program is $25,000,000 in each fiscal year from the Road Fund to support the County and City Bridge Improvement
Program.
(17) Grant Anticipation Revenue Vehicle (GARVEE) Bonds Reauthorization: The $150,000,000
GARVEE Bond Funds to be issued for the I-69 Ohio River Crossing pursuant to 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 180, Part I, A., 4.,
(15) are reauthorized.
(18) Grant Anticipation Revenue Vehicle (GARVEE) Debt Service: Included in the above Federal Funds
appropriation is $7,713,200 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $15,426,400 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for debt service
payments related to the I-69 Ohio River crossing. Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $1,928,300 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $3,856,600 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for debt service payments related to the I-69 Ohio
River crossing.
(19) Grant Anticipation Revenue Vehicle (GARVEE) Bonds Reauthorization: The $150,000,000
GARVEE Bond Funds to be issued for the Brent Spence Bridge Project pursuant to 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 214, Part I, A.,
4., (15) are reauthorized.

CHAPTER 167 5
(20) Reauthorized Grant Anticipation Revenue Vehicle (GARVEE) Bonds Debt Service: Included in
the above Federal Funds appropriation is $15,426,400 in each fiscal year for debt service payments related to the
Brent Spence Bridge Project. Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $3,856,000 in each fiscal year for
debt service payments related to the Brent Spence Bridge Project.
(21) Strategic Highway Investment Formula for Tomorrow Scores and Reporting: The Transportation
Cabinet shall provide Strategic Highway Investment Formula for Tomorrow (SHIFT) scores for each district and
statewide project to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by October 1, 2027.
(22) Recycled Asphalt Products: The Transportation Cabinet shall not restrict the use of recycled asphalt
products for any asphalt mixture used on a project, provided that the asphalt mixture meets the established
performance criteria. The Transportation Cabinet shall report on the percentage of recycled asphalt products used in
state projects to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on or before November 1, 2027. It is the
intent of the General Assembly that by 2030, the Transportation Cabinet shall use an asphalt mixture that utilizes 30
percent or greater recycled asphalt products.
(23) I-69 Ohio River Crossing - Contingent Funds: Notwithstanding 2024 Ky Acts ch. 223, sec. 55, the
General Fund appropriation for the 2024-2026 Biennial Highway Construction Plan project number 2-1088.52 shall
not be contingent upon receipt of a federal Multimodal Project Discretionary Grant. This appropriation shall instead
be contingent upon the project's selection for funding through any Federal Transportation Grant Program or a Federal
Transportation Loan Program.
(24) I-69 Ohio River Crossing - Design/Build: Notwithstanding KRS 176.431(1)(a), the 2024-2026
Biennial Highway Construction Plan project number 2-1088.52 may utilize design-build procurement methods.
(25) I-69 Ohio River Crossing - Financial Plan Ratification: Pursuant to KRS 175B.020(10)(a)5., the
General Assembly hereby authorizes the Kentucky Public Transportation Infrastructure Authority (KPTIA) to act as
the developing and issuing authority as described in KRS 175B.025, as necessary to facilitate the completion,
operating, and maintenance of the I-69 Ohio River Crossing Project and hereby ratifies the financial plan for the
project adopted by KPTIA Resolution 2025-1 and the bi-state development agreement for the project approved by
KPTIA Resolution 2025-2.
(26) I-69 Ohio River Crossing - Reimbursement: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is
$20,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $150,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support reimbursement payments
from Indiana for construction expenses on the I-69 Ohio River Crossing.
(27) Contractual Increases: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $3,100,000 in each
fiscal year for increased contract costs for contract services with Trimarc and the Cumberland Gap Tunnel.
(28) Highway District Lettings: It is the intent of the 2026 General Assembly that the Transportation
Cabinet shall ensure an equitable distribution of small-scale construction lettings among highway districts. For
purposes of this subsection, "small-scale construction lettings" means individual construction contracts with an
estimated value of less than $20,000,000. This is intended to promote geographic balance in the delivery of smaller
construction projects, maintain workforce and contractor participation across all highway districts, and support
consistent infrastructure investment statewide. On May 1 and November 1 of each fiscal year, the total dollar amount
of small-scale construction lettings within each highway district for the previous six months shall be reported to the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the Interim Joint Committee on Transportation. Any
project that is let in an area that has an emergency declared by the President of the United States shall not count
towards this total.
(29) Excess and Surplus Property Inventory: The Transportation Cabinet shall, by December 1 of each
fiscal year, submit a written report to the Interim Joint Committee on Transportation regarding property acquired for
highway construction projects that has been deemed excess or surplus. This report shall include, at a minimum:
(a) An identification of all inventory currently classified as excess or surplus;
(b) The total number of lots currently held in said inventory;
(c) The estimated fair market value of the excess and surplus property; and
(d) The total volume and value of excess and surplus property sold during the preceding calendar year.
(30) Design/Build Procurement: Notwithstanding KRS 176.431, the Transportation Cabinet is authorized
to utilize design/build procurement methods for any project in the Biennial Highway Construction Plan. The
Transportation Cabinet shall report to the Interim Joint Committee on Transportation by November 1 of each fiscal
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
year. This report shall include but not be limited to identification of all projects utilizing design/build procurement,
the current status of each project, and a detailed accounting of costs incurred and projected for each project.
(31) Highway Planning: Included in the above appropriations is $835,500 in Road Fund and $6,219,500 in
Federal Funds in each fiscal year to support increased federal funding for the Planning Work Program.
5. JUDGMENTS
(1) Payment of Judgments: Road Fund resources required to pay judgments shall be transferred from the
State Construction Account at the time when actual payments must be disbursed from the State Treasury.
6. PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 14,952,800 14,485,500
Restricted Funds 647,200 595,700
Federal Funds 41,838,100 41,873,800
TOTAL 57,438,100 56,955,000
(1) Nonpublic School Transportation: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $4,800,000 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,650,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for nonpublic school transportation.
7. REVENUE SHARING
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 24,000,000 26,000,000
Road Fund 341,452,400 360,734,600
TOTAL 365,452,400 386,734,600
(1) County Road Aid Program: Included in the above appropriations is $129,001,300 in Road Fund in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $136,303,000 in Road Fund and $13,000,000 in General Fund in fiscal year 2027-2028 for
the County Road Aid Program to be distributed in accordance with KRS 177.320, 179.410, 179.415, and 179.440.
(2) Rural Secondary Program: Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $156,493,400 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 and $165,351,200 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Rural Secondary Program in accordance with
KRS 177.320, 177.330, 177.340, 177.350, and 177.360.
(3) Municipal Road Aid Program: Included in the above appropriations is $54,279,200 in Road Fund in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $57,351,500 in Road Fund and $13,000,000 in General Fund in fiscal year 2027-2028 for
the Municipal Road Aid Program to be distributed in accordance with KRS 177.365, 177.366, and 177.369.
(4) Energy Recovery Road Fund: Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $181,000 in each
fiscal year for the Energy Recovery Road Fund in accordance with KRS 177.977, 177.9771, 177.978, 177.979, and
177.981.
(5) Continuation of the Flex Funds and 80/20 Bridge Replacement Programs: The Transportation
Cabinet shall continue the Flex Funds and the 80/20 Bridge Replacement Programs within the Rural Secondary
Program.
(6) County Judge/Executive Expense Allowance: Notwithstanding KRS 67.722, County
Judges/Executive not serving in a consolidated local government that served as a County Judge/Executive prior to
November 2022 shall receive an annual expense allowance of $3,000. County Judges/Executive newly elected in
November 2022 or thereafter and those serving in counties with a consolidated local government shall not receive an
annual expense allowance.
(7) Grant Pool: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $24,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027
for a grant pool for cities and counties. The administration of these funds shall be subject to the following conditions:
(a) Each county shall be eligible to receive up to $100,000 in each fiscal year; however, any county
containing a consolidated local government, an urban-county government, or a county government whose county seat
is not a unified city shall be eligible to receive up to $200,000 in each fiscal year;
(b) Each city that serves as a county seat, excluding Lexington and Louisville, shall be eligible to receive
up to $100,000 in each fiscal year. In the event a county seat does not apply for or exhaust its full allocation within

CHAPTER 167 7
the fiscal year, any remaining funds specifically allocated to that county seat may be made available to other
incorporated cities within the same county;
(c) Cities and counties shall apply for a grant only for projects located on a city or county road. All grant
applications shall include the project and the estimated project cost. Authorized projects shall include but are not
limited to city and county road improvements, construction of new routes, sidewalk construction and repair,
multimodal transportation projects, and pavement resurfacing;
(d) No grant shall be awarded without a dollar-for-dollar local match. Local matching funds shall be
derived from sources other than the county or municipal aid funds distributed pursuant to KRS 177.320, 177.366,
177.369, 179.410 and 179.415; and
(e) The Department of Rural and Municipal Aid shall administer the grant pool. The Department shall
submit a report to the Interim Joint Committee on Transportation by December 1 of fiscal year 2027-2028 detailing
the funding amounts authorized, the status of projects, and a summary of completed works.
8. VEHICLE REGULATION
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds -0- 23,102,700 21,410,300
Federal Funds -0- 4,627,100 4,627,100
Road Fund 5,035,600 74,555,500 70,979,900
TOTAL 5,035,600 102,285,300 97,017,300
(1) Regional Driver Licensing Offices Level of Service Report: The Department of Vehicle Regulation
shall develop a level of service report that will provide data regarding the wait times at each regional driver licensing
office and an overall statewide summary. This report shall include data of actual wait times from customers’ arrivals
to the time they reach the transaction window, broken down by customers with appointments and walk-ins by each
regional driver licensing office. This report shall also include the total number of customer transactions by type of
service provided for each regional driver licensing office and recommendations to improve business processes to
reduce customer wait times. This report shall be submitted to the Interim Joint Committee on Transportation by
September 1, 2027.
(2) KINDL Debt Service Increase: Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $106,000 in each
fiscal year to support an increase in debt service for the Kentucky Information Network for Driver Licensing System
(KINDL).
(3) KINDL Maintenance and Support: Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $5,000,000 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support and maintain the Kentucky Information
Network for Driver Licensing System (KINDL).
(4) KAVIS Upgrades: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $3,600,000 in each fiscal
year to support further enhancements and connectivity for the Kentucky Automated Vehicle Information System
(KAVIS).
(5) Designated Motor Vehicle Owner: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to
implement and carry out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 45.
(6) KAVIS Programming: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to implement and
carry out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 123.
(7) Online Insurance Verification System: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to
implement and carry out the provisions of 2025 Ky. Acts ch. 39.
(8) Medical Review Board Compensation: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to
implement and carry out the provisions of 2025 Ky. Acts ch. 72.
(9) Street-Legal Special Purpose Vehicles: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to
implement and carry out the provisions of 2025 Ky. Acts ch. 89.
(10) Additional Regional Offices: Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $5,035,600 in fiscal
year 2025-2026, $16,079,700 in fiscal year 2026-2027, and $15,663,900 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support three
additional regional offices located in Barren County, Bullitt County, and Oldham County.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(11) Motor Vehicle Commissioner Investigators: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is
$325,900 in each fiscal year to support three new Program Investigator II positions.
(12) Vision Testing: Included in the above Road Fund appropriation is $125,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to
allow a vision testing program for driver's licensing renewal to be completed at public libraries. Each public library
may participate in the program to provide vision testing at no cost to the public provided the library has entered into a
Memorandum of Agreement with the Transportation Cabinet. The Transportation Cabinet shall be responsible for all
associated costs of implementing and operating the program, which shall include but not be limited to providing the
appropriate training and equipment.
TOTAL - TRANSPORTATION CABINET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 40,606,800 42,123,200
Restricted Funds -0- 262,257,800 390,487,700
Federal Funds -0- 1,328,474,000 1,337,716,100
Road Fund 5,035,600 1,777,021,000 1,846,843,600
TOTAL 5,035,600 3,408,359,600 3,617,170,600
PART II
CAPITAL PROJECTS BUDGET
(1) Capital Construction Fund Appropriations and Reauthorizations: Moneys in the Capital
Construction Fund are appropriated for the following capital projects subject to the conditions and procedures in this
Act. Items listed without appropriated amounts are previously authorized for which no additional amount is required.
These items are listed in order to continue their current authorization into the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium. Unless
otherwise specified, reauthorized projects shall conform to the original authorization enacted by the General
Assembly.
(2) Expiration of Existing Line-Item Capital Construction Projects: All appropriations to existing line-
item capital construction and information technology projects expire on June 30, 2026, unless reauthorized in this Act
with the following exceptions:
(a) A construction contract for the project shall have been awarded by June 30, 2026;
(b) Permanent financing or a short-term line of credit sufficient to cover the total authorized project scope
shall have been obtained in the case of projects authorized for bonds, if the authorized project completes an initial
draw on the line of credit within the biennium immediately subsequent to the original authorization; and
(c) Grant or loan agreements, if applicable, shall have been finalized and properly signed by all necessary
parties.
Notwithstanding the criteria set forth in this subsection and KRS 45.229 and 45.770(5)(d), funds appropriated
to the 2022-2024 and 2024-2026 fiscal biennia maintenance pools shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
(3) Bond Proceeds Investment Income: Investment income earned from bond proceeds beyond that
which is required to satisfy Internal Revenue Service arbitrage rebates and penalties and excess bond proceeds upon
the completion of a bond-financed capital project shall be used to pay debt service according to the Internal Revenue
Service Code and accompanying regulations.
(4) Appropriations for Projects Not Line-Itemized: Inasmuch as the identification of specific projects
cannot be ascertained with absolute certainty at this time, amounts are appropriated for specific purposes to projects
which are not individually identified in this Act in the following area: maintenance pools. Notwithstanding any
statute to the contrary, projects estimated to cost $1,000,000 and over and equipment estimated to cost $200,000 and
over shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.
A. TRANSPORTATION CABINET
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028

CHAPTER 167 9
Road Fund 4,000,000 4,000,000
002. Construct Ballard County Maintenance Facility and Salt Storage Reauthorization ($3,513,000 Road
Fund)
003. Construct Hopkins County Maintenance and Salt Storage Facility Reauthorization ($2,770,000 Road
Fund)
004. Construct Whitley County Maintenance and Salt Storage Facility Reauthorization ($4,500,000 Road
Fund)
005. Construct District 2 Office and Materials Lab Reauthorization ($2,000,000 Road Fund)
006. Construct Regional Salt Structures Reauthorization ($2,000,000 Road Fund)
007. Construct Hart County Maintenance and Salt Facility Reauthorization ($3,000,000 Road Fund)
008. Construct Union County Maintenance and Salt Facility Reauthorization ($3,500,000 Road Fund)
2. AVIATION
001. Aircraft Major Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 1,200,000 1,200,000
3. HIGHWAYS
001. Road Maintenance Parks - 2026-2028
Road Fund 1,500,000 1,500,000
002. Increase Truck Parking Capacity
Federal Funds 5,000,000 -0-
003. Jefferson County - Lease
004. Knott County - Lease
PART III
FUNDS TRANSFER
The General Assembly finds that the financial condition of state government requires the following action.
Notwithstanding the statutes or requirements of the Restricted Funds enumerated below, there is transferred to
the General Fund the following amounts in fiscal year 2026-2027 and fiscal year 2027-2028:
2026-27 2027-28
A. TRANSPORTATION CABINET
1. Aviation
Agency Revenue Fund 2,040,400 1,596,600
(KRS 183.525(4) and (5))
TOTAL - FUNDS TRANSFER 2,040,400 1,596,600
PART IV
TRANSPORTATION CABINET BUDGET SUMMARY
OPERATING BUDGET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 40,606,800 42,123,200
Restricted Funds -0- 262,257,800 390,487,700
Federal Funds -0- 1,328,474,000 1,337,716,100
Road Fund 5,035,600 1,777,021,000 1,846,843,600
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
SUBTOTAL 5,035,600 3,408,359,600 3,617,170,600
CAPITAL PROJECTS BUDGET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
Federal Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
Road Fund -0- 5,500,000 5,500,000
Investment Income -0- 1,200,000 1,200,000
SUBTOTAL -0- 11,700,000 6,700,000
TOTAL - TRANSPORTATION CABINET BUDGET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 40,606,800 42,123,200
Restricted Funds -0- 262,257,800 390,487,700
Federal Funds -0- 1,333,474,000 1,337,716,100
Road Fund 5,035,600 1,782,521,000 1,852,343,600
Investment Income -0- 1,200,000 1,200,000
TOTAL FUNDS 5,035,600 3,420,059,600 3,623,870,600
Vetoed in Part and Overridden April 14, 2026.